Utah statutes.
40-10-1.   Legislative finding.

The Utah Legislature finds that:

(1)  Coal mining operations presently contribute significantly to the nation's energy requirements; surface coal mining constitutes one method of extraction of the resource; the overwhelming percentage of Utah's coal reserves can only be extracted by underground mining methods; and it is, therefore, essential to the national interest to insure the existence of an expanding and economically healthy underground coal mining industry.

(2)  The expansion of coal mining in Utah to meet the nation's energy needs makes even more urgent the establishment of appropriate standards to minimize damage to the environment and to productivity of the soil and to protect the health and safety of the public.

(3)  Surface mining and reclamation technology is now developed so that effective and reasonable regulation of surface coal mining operations is an appropriate and necessary means to minimize so far as practicable the adverse social, economic, and environmental effects of the mining operations.

(4)  In recognition of the innate differences between coal and other mineral deposits and between surface and underground mining methods, the Legislature perceives a need for a separate chapter for effective and reasonable regulation of such operations.

